apertium-grc.grc.lexd
αβυσσος:ἀ{'}βυσσ[ος-ου,η]
αγαθοποιια:ἀγαθοποιϊ{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αγαθοποιος:ἀγαθοποι[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αγαθωσυνη:ἀγαθωσυ{'}ν[η-ης,η]
αγαλλιασις:ἀγαλλι{'}ασ[ις-εως,η]
αγαμος:ἀ{'}γαμ[ος-ου,ο,η]
αγανακτησις:ἀγανα{'}κτησ[ις-εως,η]
αγαπη:ἀγα{'}π[η-ης,η]
αγγειον:ἀγγει{'}[ον-ου,το]
αγγελια:ἀγγελι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αγγελος:ἀ{'}γγελ[ος-ου,ο]
# ἄγγος, -εος, τό # TODO
αγελη:ἀγε{'}λ[η-ης,η]
αγιασμος:ἁγιασμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αγιοτης:ἁγιο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αγιωσυνη:ἁγιωσυ{'}ν[η-ης,η]
αγκαλη:ἀγκα{'}λ[η-ης,η]
αγκιστρον:ἀ{'}γκιστρ[ον-ου,το]
αγκυρα:ἀ{'}γκυρ[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αγνεια:ἁγνει{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αγνισμος:ἁγνισμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αγνοημα:ἀγνο{'}ηματ[_-ος,το]
αγνοια:ἀ{'}γνοι[α-ας,η]
αγνοτης:ἁγνο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αγνωσια:ἀγνωσι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αγορα:ἀγορ[ᾱ-ᾱς,η,'$]
αγρα:ἀ{'}γρ[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αγριελαιος:ἀγριε{'}λαι[ος-ου,η]
αγρος:ἀγρ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αγρυπνια:ἀγρυπνι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αγωγη:ἀγωγ[η-ης,η,'$]
αγων:ἀγω{'}ν[_-ος,ο]
αγωνια:ἀγωνι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αδελφη:ἀδελφ[η-ης,η,'$]
αδελφος:ἀδελφ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αδελφοτης:ἀδελφο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αδηλοτης:ἀδηλο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αδιαφθορια:ἀδιαφθορι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αδικημα:ἀδι{'}κηματ[_-ος,το]
αδικια:ἀδικι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αδροτης:ἁδρο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αετος:ἀετ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αηρ:ἀ{εη}{'}ρ[_-ος,ο]
αθανασια:ἀθανασι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αθετησις:ἀθε{'}τησ[ις-εως,η]
αθλησις:ἀ{'}θλησ[ις-εως,η]
αιγιαλος:αἰγιαλ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αιδως:αἰδ[ως-ους,η,'$]
αιμα:αἱ{'}ματ[_-ος,το]
αιματεκχυσια:αἱματεκχυσι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αινεσις:αἰ{'}νεσ[ις-εως,η]
αινιγμα:αἰ{'}νιγματ[_-ος,το]
αινος:αἰ{'}ν[ος-ου,ο]
αιρεσις:αἱ{'}ρεσ[ις-εως,η]
αισθησις:αἰ{'}σθησ[ις-εως,η]
αισθητηριον:αἰσθητη{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
αισχρολογια:αἰσχρολογι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αισχροτης:αἰσχρο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αισχυνη:αἰσχυ{'}ν[η-ης,η]
αιτημα:αἰ{'}τηματ[_-ος,το]
αιτια:αἰτι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αιτιωμα:αἰτι{'}ωματ[_-ος,το]
αιτιον:αἰ{'}τι[ον-ου,το]
αιτιος:αἰ{'}τι[ος-ου,ο]
αιχμαλωσια:αἰχμαλωσι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αιχμαλωτος:αἰχμα{'}λωτ[ος-ου,ο]
αιων:αἰω{'}ν[_-ος,ο]
ακαθαρσια:ἀκαθαρσι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ακανθα:ἀ{'}κανθ[α-ης,η]
ακαταστασια:ἀκαταστασι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ακοη:ἀκο[η-ης,η,'$]
ακρασια:ἀκρασι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ακριβεια:ἀκρι{'}βει[α-ας,η]
ακρις:ἀκρι{'}δ[ις-δος,η,'$]
ακροατηριον:ἀκροατη{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
ακροατης:ἀκροατ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
ακροβυστια:ἀκροβυστι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ακροθινιον:ἀκροθι{'}νι[ον-ου,το]
ακρον:ἀ{'}κρ[ον-ου,το]
αλαβαστρον:ἀλα{'}βαστρ[ον-ου,το]
αλαζονεια:ἀλαζονει{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αλαζων:ἀλαζο{'}ν[ν-νος,ο]
αλας:ἁ{'}λατ[ς-ος,το]
αλεκτοροφωνια:ἀλεκτοροφωνι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αλεκτωρ:ἀλε{'}κτ{οω}ρ[_-ος,ο]
αλεκτωρ:ἀλε{'}τ{οω}ρ[_-ος,ο]
αλευρον:ἀ{'}λευρ[ον-ου,το]
αληθεια:ἀλη{'}θει[α-ας,η]
αλιευς:ἁλι[ευς-εως,ο]
αλισγημα:ἀλι{'}σγηματ[_-ος,το]
αλλοτριοεπισκοπος:ἀλλοτριοεπι{'}σκοπ[ος-ου,ο]
αλοη:ἀλο{'}[η-ης,η]
αλς:ἁλ[ς-ος,ο,1σ]
αλυσις:ἁ{'}λυσ[ις-εως,η]
αλων:ἁ{'}λων[_-ος,η]
αλωπηξ:ἀλω{'}π{εη}κ[ς-ος,η]
αλωσις:ἁ{'}λωσ[ις-εως,η]
αμαρτημα:ἁμα{'}ρτηματ[_-ος,το]
αμαρτια:ἁμαρτι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αμεθυστος:ἀμε{'}θυστ[ος-ου,η]
αμμος:ἀ{'}μμ[ος-ου,η]
αμνος:ἀμν[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αμοιβη:ἀμοιβ[η-ης,η,'$]
αμπελος:ἀ{'}μπελ[ος-ου,η]
αμπελουργος:ἀμπελουργ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αμπελων:ἀμπελω{'}ν[_-ος,ο]
αμφιβληστρον:ἀμφι{'}βληστρ[ον-ου,το]
αμφοδον:ἀ{'}μφοδ[ον-ου,το]
αναβαθμος:ἀναβαθμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αναβλεψις:ἀνα{'}βλεψ[ις-εως,η]
αναβολη:ἀναβολ[η-ης,η,'$]
αναγκη:ἀνα{'}γκ[η-ης,η]
αναγνωσις:ἀνα{'}γνωσ[ις-εως,η]
αναδειξις:ἀνα{'}δειξ[ις-εως,η]
αναθεμα:ἀνα{'}θεματ[_-ος,το]
αναθημα:ἀνα{'}θηματ[_-ος,το]
αναιδεια:ἀναι{'}δει[α-ας,η]
αναιρεσις:ἀναι{'}ρεσ[ις-εως,η]
ανακαινωσις:ἀνακαι{'}νωσ[ις-εως,η]
ανακρισις:ἀνα{'}κρισ[ις-εως,η]
αναληψις:ἀνα{'}ληψ[ις-εως,η]
αναλογια:ἀναλογι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αναλυσις:ἀνα{'}λυσ[ις-εως,η]
αναμνησις:ἀνα{'}μνησ[ις-εως,η]
αναπαυσις:ἀνα{'}παυσ[ις-εως,η]
αναστασις:ἀνα{'}στασ[ις-εως,η]
αναστροφη:ἀναστροφ[η-ης,η,'$]
ανατολη:ἀνατολ[η-ης,η,'$]
αναχυσις:ἀνα{'}χυσ[ις-εως,η]
αναψυξις:ἀνα{'}ψυξ[ις-εως,η]
ανδραποδιστης:ἀνδραποδιστ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
ανδροφονος:ἀνδροφο{'}ν[ος-ου,ο]
ανεμος:ἀ{'}νεμ[ος-ου,ο]
ανεσις:ἀ{'}νεσ[ις-εως,η]
ανεψιος:ἀνεψι[ος-ου,ο,'$]
ανηθον:ἀ{'}νηθ[ον-ου,το]
ανηρ:ἀν[ηρ-ρος,ο,'$]
ανθος:ἀ{'}νθ[ος-ους,το]
ανθρακια:ἀνθρακι[ᾱ-ᾱς,η,'$]
ανθραξ:ἀ{'}νθρακ[ς-ος,ο]
ανθρωποκτονος:ἀνθρωποκτο{'}ν[ος-ου,ο]
ανθρωπος:ἀ{'}νθρωπ[ος-ου,ο]
ανθυπατος:ἀνθυ{'}πατ[ος-ου,ο]
ανοια:ἀ{'}νοι[α-ας,η]
ανοιξις:ἀ{'}νοιξ[ις-εως,η]
ανομια:ἀνομι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ανοχη:ἀνοχ[η-ης,η,'$]
ανταλλαγμα:ἀντα{'}λλαγματ[_-ος,το]
ανταποδομα:ἀνταπο{'}δοματ[_-ος,το]
ανταποδοσις:ἀνταπο{'}δοσ[ις-εως,η]
αντιδικος:ἀντι{'}δικ[ος-ου,ο]
αντιθεσις:ἀντι{'}θεσ[ις-εως,η]
αντιληψις:ἀντι{'}ληψ[ις-εως,η]
αντιλογια:ἀντιλογι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αντιλυτρον:ἀντι{'}λυτρ[ον-ου,το]
αντιμισθια:ἀντιμισθι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αντιχριστος:ἀντι{'}χριστ[ος-ου,ο]
αντλημα:ἀ{'}ντληματ[_-ος,το]
ανωγεον:ἀνω{'}γε[ον-ου,το]
αξινη:ἀξι{'}ν[η-ης,η]
απαντησις:ἀπα{'}ντησ[ις-εως,η]
απαρτισμος:ἀπαρτισμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
απαρχη:ἀπαρχ[η-ης,η,'$]
απατη:ἀπα{'}τ[η-ης,η]
απατωρ:ἀπα{'}τ{οω}ρ[_-ος,το]
απαυγασμα:ἀπαυ{'}γασματ[_-ος,το]
απειθεια:ἀπει{'}θει[α-ας,η]
απειλη:ἀπειλ[η-ης,η,'$]
απεκδυσις:ἀπε{'}κδυσ[ις-εως,η]
απελεγμος:ἀπελεγμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
απελευθερος:ἀπελευ{'}θερ[ος-ου,ο]
απιστια:ἀπιστι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
απλοτης:ἁπλο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αποβολη:ἀποβολ[η-ης,η,'$]
απογραφη:ἀπογραφ[η-ης,η,'$]
αποδειξις:ἀπο{'}δειξ[ις-εως,η]
αποδοχη:ἀποδοχ[η-ης,η,'$]
αποθεσις:ἀπο{'}θεσ[ις-εως,η]
αποθηκη:ἀποθη{'}κ[η-ης,η]
αποκαλυψις:ἀποκα{'}λυψ[ις-εως,η]
αποκαραδοκια:ἀποκαραδοκι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αποκαταστασις:ἀποκατα{'}στασ[ις-εως,η]
αποκριμα:ἀπο{'}κριματ[_-ος,το]
αποκρισις:ἀπο{'}κρισ[ις-εως,η]
απολαυσις:ἀπο{'}λαυσ[ις-εως,η]
απολογια:ἀπολογι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
απολυτρωσις:ἀπολυ{'}τρωσ[ις-εως,η]
απορια:ἀπορι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αποσκιασμα:ἀποσκι{'}ασματ[_-ος,το]
αποστασια:ἀποστασι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αποστασιον:ἀποστα{'}σι[ον-ου,το]
αποστολη:ἀποστολ[η-ης,η,'$]
αποστολος:ἀπο{'}στολ[ος-ου,ο]
αποτομια:ἀποτομι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
απουσια:ἀπουσι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αποχρησις:ἀπο{'}χρησ[ις-εως,η]
απωλεια:ἀπω{'}λει[α-ας,η]
αρα:ἀρ[ᾱ-ᾱς,η,'$]
αργυριον:ἀργυ{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
αργυροκοπος:ἀργυροκο{'}π[ος-ου,ο]
αργυρος:ἀ{'}ργυρ[ος-ου,ο]
αρεσκεια:ἀρε{'}σκει[α-ας,η]
αρετη:ἀρετ[η-ης,η,'$]
# ἀρήν, ἀρνός, ὁ # TODO
αριθμος:ἀριθμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αριστον:ἀ{'}ριστ[ον-ου,το]
αρκος:ἀ{'}ρκ[ος-ου,ο,η]
αρμα:ἁ{'}ρματ[_-ος,το]
αρμος:ἁρμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αρνιον:ἀρνι{'}[ον-ου,το]
αροτρον:ἀ{'}ροτρ[ον-ου,το]
αρπαγη:ἁρπαγ[η-ης,η,'$]
αρπαγμος:ἁρπαγμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αρπαξ:ἁ{'}ρπαγ[ς-ος,ο]
αρραβων:ἀρραβω{'}ν[_-ος,ο]
αρσενοκοιτης:ἀρσενοκοι{'}τ[ης-ου,ο]
αρτεμων:ἀρτε{'}μον[ν-νος,ο]
αρτος:ἀ{'}ρτ[ος-ου,ο]
αρχαγγελος:ἀρχα{'}γγελ[ος-ου,ο]
αρχη:ἀρχ[η-ης,η,'$]
αρχηγος:ἀρχηγ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αρχιερευς:ἀρχιερ[ευς-εως,ο,'$]
αρχιποιμην:ἀρχιποι{'}μ{εη}ν[_-ος,ο]
αρχισυναγωγος:ἀρχισυνα{'}γωγ[ος-ου,ο]
αρχιτεκτων:ἀρχιτε{'}κτον[ν-νος,ο]
αρχιτελωνης:ἀρχιτελω{'}ν[ης-ου,ο]
αρχιτρικλινος:ἀρχιτρι{'}κλιν[ος-ου,ο]
αρχων:ἀρχ{οω}ντ[_-ος,ο]
αρωμα:ἀ{'}ρωματ[_-ος,το]
ασεβεια:ἀσε{'}βει[α-ας,η]
ασελγεια:ἀσε{'}λγει[α-ας,η]
ασθενεια:ἀσθε{'}νει[α-ας,η]
ασθενημα:ἀσθε{'}νηματ[_-ος,το]
ασιτια:ἀσιτι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ασκος:ἀσκ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
ασπασμος:ἀσπασμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
ασπις:ἀσπι{'}δ[ις-δος,η,'$]
ασσαριον:ἀσσα{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
αστηρ:ἀστ{εη}{'}ρ[_-ος,ο]
αστραπη:ἀστραπ[η-ης,η,'$]
αστρον:ἀ{'}στρ[ον-ου,το]
ασφαλεια:ἀσφα{'}λει[α-ας,η]
ασχημοσυνη:ἀσχημοσυ{'}ν[η-ης,η]
ασωτια:ἀσωτι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ατιμια:ἀτιμι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
ατμις:ἀτμι{'}δ[ις-δος,η,'$]
αυγη:αὐγ[η-ης,η,'$]
αυλη:αὐλ[η-ης,η,'$]
αυλητης:αὐλητ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
αυλος:αὐλ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αυξησις:αὐ{'}ξησ[ις-εως,η]
αυταρκεια:αὐτα{'}ρκει[α-ας,η]
αυτοπτης:αὐτο{'}πτ[ης-ου,ο]
αυτοχειρ:αὐτο{'}χειρ[_-ος,ο]
αφανισμος:ἀφανισμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αφεδρων:ἀφεδρω{'}ν[_-ος,ο]
αφειδια:ἀφειδι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αφελοτης:ἀφελο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
αφεσις:ἀ{'}φεσ[ις-εως,η]
αφη:ἁφ[η-ης,η,'$]
αφθαρσια:ἀφθαρσι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
αφιξις:ἀ{'}φιξ[ις-εως,η]
αφορμη:ἀφορμ[η-ης,η,'$]
αφρος:ἀφρ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αφροσυνη:ἀφροσυ{'}ν[η-ης,η]
αχλυς:ἀχλυ{'}[ς-ος,η]
αχυρον:ἀ{'}χυρ[ον-ου,το]
αψινθος:ἀ{'}ψινθ[ος-ου,ο]
βαθμος:βαθμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
βαθος:βα{'}θ[ος-ους,το]
βαιον:βαϊ{'}[ον-ου,το]
βαλαντιον:βαλα{'}ντι[ον-ου,το]
βαπτισμα:βα{'}πτισματ[_-ος,το]
βαπτισμος:βαπτισμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
βαπτιστης:βαπτιστ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
βαρβαρος:βα{'}ρβαρ[ος-ου,ο]
βαρος:βα{'}ρ[ος-ους,το]
βασανισμος:βασανισμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
βασανιστης:βασανιστ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
βασανος:βα{'}σαν[ος-ου,η]
βασιλεια:βασιλει{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
βασιλευς:βασιλ[ευς-εως,ο]
βασιλισσα:βασι{'}λισσ[α-ης,η]
βασις:βα{'}σ[ις-εως,η]
βατος:βα{'}τ[ος-ου,ο,η]
βατραχος:βα{'}τραχ[ος-ου,ο]
βδελυγμα:βδε{'}λυγματ[_-ος,το]
βεβαιωσις:βεβαι{'}ωσ[ις-εως,η]
βελος:βε{'}λ[ος-ους,το]
βημα:βη{'}ματ[_-ος,το]
βηρυλλος:βη{'}ρυλλ[ος-ου,ο]
βια:βι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
βιαστης:βιαστ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
βιβλιδαριον:βιβλιδα{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
βιβλιον:βιβλι{'}[ον-ου,το]
βιβλος:βι{'}βλ[ος-ου,η]
βιθυνια:βιθυνι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
βιος:βι{'}[ος-ου,ο]
βιωσις:βι{'}ωσ[ις-εως,η]
βλασφημια:βλασφημι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
βλεμμα:βλε{'}μματ[_-ος,το]
βοη:βο[η-ης,η,'$]
βοηθεια:βοη{'}θει[α-ας,η]
βοηθος:βοηθ[ος-ου,ο,η]
βοθυνος:βο{'}θυν[ος-ου,ο]
βολη:βολ[η-ης,η,'$]
βορβορος:βο{'}ρβορ[ος-ου,ο]
βορρας:βορρ[ας-α,ο,'$]
βοτανη:βοτα{'}ν[η-ης,η]
βοτρυς:βο{'}τρυ[ς-ος,ο]
βουλευτης:βουλευτ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
βουλη:βουλ[η-ης,η,'$]
βουλημα:βου{'}ληματ[_-ος,το]
βουνος:βουν[ος-ου,ο,'$]
# βοῦς, βοός, ὁ # TODO
βραβειον:βραβει{'}[ον-ου,το]
βραδυτης:βραδυτη{'}τ[ς-ος,η,'$]
βραχιων:βραχι{'}ον[ν-νος,ο,'$]
βρεφος:βρε{'}φ[ος-ους,το]
βροντη:βροντ[η-ης,η,'$]
βροχη:βροχ[η-ης,η,'$]
βροχος:βρο{'}χ[ος-ου,ο]
βρυγμος:βρυγμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
βρωμα:βρω{'}ματ[_-ος,το]
βρωσις:βρω{'}σ[ις-εως,η]
βυθος:βυθ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
βυρσευς:βυρσ[ευς-εως,ο]
βυσσος:βυ{'}σσ[ος-ου,η]
βωμος:βωμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
γαγγραινα:γα{'}γγραιν[α-ης,η]
γαζα:γα{'}ζ[α-ης,η]
γαζοφυλακιον:γαζοφυλα{'}κι[ον-ου,το]
γαλα:γα{'}λακτ[_-ος,το]
γαληνη:γαλη{'}ν[η-ης,η]
γαμος:γα{'}μ[ος-ου,ο]
γαστηρ:γαστ[ηρ-ρος,η]
γεεννα:γε{'}ενν[α-ης,η]
γειτων:γει{'}τ{οω}ν[_-ος,ο,η]
γελως:γε{'}λωτ[ς-ος,ο]
γενεα:γενε[ᾱ-ᾱς,η,'$]
γενεαλογια:γενεαλογι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
γενεσις:γε{'}νεσ[ις-εως,η]
γενετη:γενετ[η-ης,η,'$]
γεννημα:γε{'}ννηματ[_-ος,το]
γεννησις:γε{'}ννησ[ις-εως,η]
γενος:γε{'}ν[ος-ους,το]
γερουσια:γερουσι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
γερων:γε{'}ρ{οω}ντ[_-ος,ο]
γεωργιον:γεω{'}ργι[ον-ου,το]
γεωργος:γεωργ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
# γῆ, γῆς, ἡ # TODO
# γῆρας, ρως, τό # TODO
γλευκος:γλευ{'}κ[ος-ους,το]
γλωσσα:γλω{'}σσ[α-ης,η]
γλωσσοκομον:γλωσσο{'}κομ[ον-ου,το]
γναφευς:γναφ[ευς-εως,ο]
γνοφος:γνο{'}φ[ος-ου,ο]
γνωμη:γνω{'}μ[η-ης,η]
γνωσις:γνω{'}σ[ις-εως,η]
γνωστης:γνω{'}στ[ης-ου,ο]
γογγυσμος:γογγυσμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
γογγυστης:γογγυστ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
γοης:γο{'}ητ[ς-ος,ο]
γομος:γο{'}μ[ος-ου,ο]
γονευς:γον[ευς-εως,ο]
# γόνυ, ατος, τό # TODO
γραμμα:γρα{'}μματ[_-ος,το]
γραμματευς:γραμματ[ευς-εως,ο]
γραφη:γραφ[η-ης,η,'$]
γυμνασια:γυμνασι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
γυμνοτης:γυμνο{'}τητ[ς-ος,η]
γυναικαριον:γυναικα{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
# γυνή, αικός, ἡ # TODO
γωνια:γωνι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
δαιμονιον:δαιμο{'}νι[ον-ου,το]
δαιμων:δαι{'}μον[ν-νος,ο]
δακρυον:δα{'}κρυ[ον-ου,το]
δακτυλιος:δακτυ{'}λι[ος-ου,ο]
δακτυλος:δα{'}κτυλ[ος-ου,ο]
δαμαλις:δα{'}μαλ[ις-εως,η]
δανειον:δα{'}νει[ον-ου,το]
δανειστης:δανειστ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
δαπανη:δαπα{'}ν[η-ης,η]
δεησις:δε{'}ησ[ις-εως,η]
δειγμα:δει{'}γματ[_-ος,το]
δειλια:δειλι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
δειπνον:δει{'}πν[ον-ου,το]
δεισιδαιμονια:δεισιδαιμονι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
δεκατη:δεκα{'}τ[η-ης,η]
δενδρον:δε{'}νδρ[ον-ου,το]
δεξιολαβος:δεξιο{'}λαβ[ος-ου,ο]
δερμα:δε{'}ρματ[_-ος,το]
δεσμη:δε{'}σμ[η-ης,η]
δεσμιος:δε{'}σμι[ος-ου,ο]
δεσμος:δεσμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
δεσμοφυλαξ:δεσμοφυ{'}λακ[ς-ος,ο]
δεσμωτηριον:δεσμωτη{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
δεσμωτης:δεσμω{'}τ[ης-ου,ο]
δεσποτης:δεσπο{'}τ[ης-ου,ο]
δημιουργος:δημιουργ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
δημος:δη{'}μ[ος-ου,ο]
δηναριον:δηνα{'}ρι[ον-ου,το]
διαγνωσις:δια{'}γνωσ[ις-εως,η]
διαδημα:δια{'}δηματ[_-ος,το]
διαδοχος:δια{'}δοχ[ος-ου,ο]
διαθηκη:διαθη{'}κ[η-ης,η]
διαιρεσις:διαι{'}ρεσ[ις-εως,η]
διακονια:διακονι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
διακονος:δια{'}κον[ος-ου,ο,η]
διακρισις:δια{'}κρισ[ις-εως,η]
διαλεκτος:δια{'}λεκτ[ος-ου,η]
διαλογισμος:διαλογισμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
διαμερισμος:διαμερισμ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
διανοημα:διανο{'}ηματ[_-ος,το]
διανοια:δια{'}νοι[α-ας,η]
διασπορα:διασπορ[ᾱ-ᾱς,η,'$]
διαστημα:δια{'}στηματ[_-ος,το]
διαστολη:διαστολ[η-ης,η,'$]
διαταγη:διαταγ[η-ης,η,'$]
διαταγμα:δια{'}ταγματ[_-ος,το]
διατροφη:διατροφ[η-ης,η,'$]
διαφθορα:διαφθορ[ᾱ-ᾱς,η,'$]
διδασκαλια:διδασκαλι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
διδασκαλος:διδα{'}σκαλ[ος-ου,ο]
διδαχη:διδαχ[η-ης,η,'$]
διδραχμον:δι{'}δραχμ[ον-ου,το]
διεξοδος:διε{'}ξοδ[ος-ου,η]
διερμηνευτης:διερμηνευτ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
διετια:διετι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
διηγησις:διη{'}γησ[ις-εως,η]
δικαιοκρισια:δικαιοκρισι{'}[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
δικαιοσυνη:δικαιοσυ{'}ν[η-ης,η]
δικαιωμα:δικαι{'}ωματ[_-ος,το]
δικαιωσις:δικαι{'}ωσ[ις-εως,η]
δικαστης:δικαστ[ης-ου,ο,'$]
δικη:δι{'}κ[η-ης,η]
